Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.12, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Local literacy plan. (a) Consistent with this section, a school district must adopt a local literacy plan to have every child reading at or above grade level every year beginning in kindergarten and to support multilingual learners and students receiving special education services in achieving their individualized reading goals. A district must update and submit the plan to the commissioner by June 15 each year. The plan must be consistent with the Read Act, and include the following: (1) a process to assess students' foundational reading skills, oral language, and level of reading proficiency and the approved screeners used, by school site and grade level, under section 120B.123; (2) a process to notify and involve parents; (3) a description of how schools in the district will determine the targeted reading instruction that is evidence-based and includes an intervention strategy for a student and the process for intensifying or modifying the reading strategy in order to obtain measurable reading progress; (4) evidence-based intervention methods for students who are not reading at or above grade level and progress monitoring to provide information on the effectiveness of the intervention; (5) identification of staff development needs, including a plan to meet those needs; (6) the curricula used by school site and grade level and, if applicable, the district plan and timeline for adopting approved curricula and materials starting in the 2025-2026 school year; (7) a statement of whether the district has adopted a MTSS framework; (8) student data using the measures of foundational literacy skills and mastery identified by the Department of Education for the following students: (i) students in kindergarten through grade 3; (ii) students who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia; and (iii) students in grades 4 to 12 who are identified as not reading at grade level; (9) the number of teachers and other staff who have completed training approved by the department; (10) the number of teachers and other staff proposed for training in structured literacy; and (11) how the district used funding provided under the Read Act to implement the requirements of the Read Act. (b) The district must post its literacy plan on the official school district website and submit it to the commissioner of education using the template developed by the commissioner of education beginning June 15, 2024. (c) By March 1, 2024, the commissioner of education must develop a streamlined template for local literacy plans that meets the requirements of this subdivision and requires all reading instruction and teacher training in reading instruction to be evidence-based. The template must require a district to report information using the student categories required in the commissioner's report under paragraph (d). The template must focus district resources on improving students' foundational reading skills while reducing paperwork requirements for teachers. (d) By December 1, 2025, the commissioner of education must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over prekindergarten through grade 12 education summarizing the local literacy plans submitted to the commissioner. The summary must include the following information: (1) the number of teachers and other staff who have completed training approved by the Department of Education; (2) the number of teachers and other staff required to complete the training under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, who have not completed the training; (3) the number of teachers exempt under section 120B.123, subdivision 5, from completing training approved by the Department of Education; new text begin (4) the number of teachers or other staff required to complete the training who received other training or education that meets the requirements of the training approved by the Department of Education; new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end by school site and grade, the approved screeners and the reading curriculum used; and deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end by school site and grade, using the measurements of foundational literacy skills and mastery identified by the department, both aggregated data and disaggregated data on student performance on the approved screeners using the student categories under section 120B.35, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2). (e) By December 1, 2026, and December 1, 2027, the commissioner of education must submit updated reports containing the information required under paragraph (d) to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over prekindergarten through grade 12 education. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.123, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Professional development. (a) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers and staff by July 1, 2026: (1) reading intervention teachers working with students in kindergarten through grade 12; (2) all classroom teachers of students in kindergarten through grade 3 and children in prekindergarten programs; (3) special education teachers; (4) curriculum directors; (5) instructional support staff, contractors, and volunteers who assist in providing Tier 2 interventions; (6) employees who select literacy instructional materials for a district; and (7) teachers licensed to teach English to multilingual learners. (b) A district must provide training from a menu of approved evidence-based training programs to the following teachers by July 1, 2027: (1) teachers who provide reading instruction to students in grades 4 to 12; and (2) teachers who provide instruction to students in a state-approved alternative program. (c) The commissioner of education may grant a district an extension to the deadlines in this subdivision. (d) Training provided by a department-approved certified trained facilitator may satisfy the professional development requirements under this subdivision. new text begin (e) Beginning June 30, 2025, an educator required to receive training under paragraph (a) who is new to the state of Minnesota or is a newly licensed teacher who did not receive instruction in the teaching of foundational reading skills based on structured literacy must complete one of the three approved required trainings. Training must be offered through the regional literacy network and facilitated by a local certified and trained facilitator. The Department of Education must review educator profiles and previous training and grant waivers to educators who are new to the state who have completed the professional development requirements consistent with this subdivision. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end For the 2024-2025 new text begin and 2025-2026 new text end school deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin yearsnew text end only, the hours of instruction requirement under section 120A.41 for students in deleted text begin andeleted text end elementarynew text begin and secondarynew text end school, as defined in section 120A.05, deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionsnew text end 9new text begin and 13new text end , is reduced by 5-1/2 hours for a district that enters into an agreement with the exclusive representative of the teachers that requires teachers to receive at least 5-1/2 hours of approved evidence-based training required under this subdivision, on a day when other students in the district receive instruction. If a charter school's teachers are not represented by an exclusive representative, the charter school may reduce the number of instructional hours for students in deleted text begin andeleted text end elementarynew text begin and secondarynew text end school, as defined in section 120A.05, deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionsnew text end 9new text begin and 13new text end , by 5-1/2 hours after consulting with its teachers in order to provide teachers with at least 5-1/2 hours of evidence-based training required under this subdivision on a day when other students receive instruction.new text begin The hours of instruction reduction for secondary school students is applicable only for the 2025-2026 school year.new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.123, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Teacher licensure; renewal. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning July 1, 2025, a Tier 1 early learning, elementary education, or special education teacher responsible for teaching reading and licensed under section 122A.181 must demonstrate that they are registered for, currently taking, or have completed evidence-based structured literacy training consistent with training approved by the Department of Education for the teacher's first licensure renewal. A Tier 1 teacher may demonstrate evidence of progress in meeting the subject matter standards for reading in administrative rules through evidence-based structured literacy coursework or through the department educator profile review under subdivision 5, paragraph (e). The required training must be completed before a second renewal of the Tier 1 license. new text end new text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2025, a Tier 2 early learning, elementary education, or special education teacher who is responsible for teaching reading and licensed under section 122A.182 must demonstrate that they are currently taking or have completed evidence-based structured literacy training consistent with training approved by the Department of Education for the teacher's first licensure renewal. A Tier 2 teacher may demonstrate evidence of progress in meeting the subject matter standards for reading in administrative rules through evidence-based structured literacy coursework or through the department educator profile review under subdivision 5, paragraph (e). The required training must be completed before the first renewal of the Tier 2 license is granted. new text end new text begin (c) Beginning July 1, 2026, a Tier 3 early learning, elementary education, or special education teacher licensure candidate under section 122A.183 who demonstrates field-specific teaching experience to complete the coursework requirements under section 122A.183, subdivision 2, must demonstrate they have completed evidence-based structured literacy training required under subdivision 5 before the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board issues the Tier 3 license. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.124, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Reconsiderationdeleted text end new text begin Curriculum review cyclenew text end . (a) new text begin Every five years, beginning July 1, 2030, new text end the department and CAREI must provide districts an opportunity to request that the department and CAREI add to the list of new text begin reviewed new text end curricula deleted text begin or professional developmentdeleted text end new text begin and interventionnew text end programs deleted text begin a specific curriculum or professional development programdeleted text end . The department must publish the deleted text begin requestdeleted text end new text begin procedurenew text end for deleted text begin reconsideration proceduredeleted text end new text begin reviewnew text end on the department websitenew text begin by July 1, 2029new text end . A request for deleted text begin reconsiderationdeleted text end new text begin reviewnew text end must demonstrate that the curriculum or deleted text begin professional developmentdeleted text end new text begin interventionnew text end program meets the requirements of the Read Act, is evidence-based, and has structured literacy components. deleted text begin The department and CAREI must review the request for reconsideration and approve or deny the request within 60 days.deleted text end new text begin The review process must use the rubric used to approve curriculum under subdivision 1 with the addition of culturally responsive criteria as determined by the third-party review.new text end (b) deleted text begin The department and CAREI must conduct a final curriculum review of previously submitted curriculum by March 3, 2025, to review curriculum that is available to districts at no cost.deleted text end new text begin The reviewed resources must be categorized as highly aligned, partially aligned, minimally aligned, or not aligned to evidenced-based structured literacy practices. Nonranked curricular resources do not meet the criteria to be classified as a Tier 1 core highly aligned program. The reviewed resources categories are defined as follows:new text end new text begin (1) "highly aligned" means 100 percent of domains were above the cut point with no significant red flags identified for the program; new text end new text begin (2) "partially aligned" means 60 to 99 percent of domains were above the cut point; new text end new text begin (3) "minimally aligned" means 34 to 59 percent of domains were above the cut point; and new text end new text begin (4) "not aligned" means 33 percent or less of domains were above the cut point. new text end new text begin It is a district's responsibility when planning for curriculum implementation to verify instruction and materials align with evidence-based structured literacy practices and to resolve issues identified in the report and rubric provided by the Department of Education. new text end new text begin (c) A district must ensure that any red flags for a program are resolved through district enhancements to the selected program. new text end new text begin (d) A program going through a full review cycle must be added to the reviewed curricula and intervention program list after the review process is completed. new text end new text begin (e) Only materials categorized as highly aligned may qualify for use of literacy incentive aid under section 124D.98 or state funding provided under the Read Act. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 1 license for a term of one year. A Tier 1 license may be renewed subject to paragraphs (b) deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end (c)new text begin , and (d)new text end . (b) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must renew a Tier 1 license if: (1) the district or charter school requesting the renewal demonstrates that it has posted the teacher position but was unable to hire an acceptable teacher with a Tier 2, 3, or 4 license for the position; (2) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license took a content examination in accordance with section 122A.185 and submitted the examination results to the teacher's employing district or charter school within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; (3) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license participated in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; and (4) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license met the mental illness training renewal requirement under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. The requirement in clause (2) does not apply to a teacher that teaches a class in a career and technical education or career pathways course of study. (c) A Tier 1 license must not be renewed more than three times, unless the requesting district or charter school can show good cause for additional renewals. A Tier 1 license issued to teach (1) a class or course in a career and technical education or career pathway course of study, or (2) in a shortage area, as defined in section 122A.06, subdivision 6, may be renewed without limitation. new text begin (d) Beginning July 1, 2025, a Tier 1 licensed early learning, elementary education, or special education teacher responsible for teaching reading must meet the evidence-based literacy training requirements under section 120B.123, subdivision 5a, for their first licensure renewal. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. new text begin (a) new text end The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 2 license for a term of two years. A Tier 2 license may be renewed three times. new text begin (b) new text end Before a Tier 2 license is renewed for the first time, a teacher holding a Tier 2 license must participate in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, and mental illness training under section 122A.187, subdivision 6. new text begin (c) Beginning July 1, 2025, a Tier 2 licensed early learning, elementary education, or special education teacher responsible for teaching reading must demonstrate they have completed the evidence-based literacy training requirements of section 120B.123, subdivision 5a, for the first renewal of their initial license. new text end new text begin (d) new text end The board must issue rules setting forth the conditions for additional renewals after the initial license has been renewed three times. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.183, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Coursework. new text begin (a) new text end An applicant for a Tier 3 license must meet the coursework requirement by demonstrating one of the following: (1) completion of a Minnesota-approved teacher preparation program; (2) completion of a state-approved teacher preparation program that includes field-specific student teaching equivalent to field-specific student teaching in Minnesota-approved teacher preparation programs. The field-specific student teaching requirement does not apply to an applicant that has two years of field-specific teaching experience; (3) a recommendation for licensure through the licensure via portfolio process; (4) a professional teaching license from another state, evidence that the applicant's license is in good standing, and two years of field-specific teaching experience; or (5) three years of teaching experience under a Tier 2 license and evidence of summative teacher evaluations that did not result in placing or otherwise keeping the teacher on an improvement process pursuant to section 122A.40, subdivision 8, or 122A.41, subdivision 5. new text begin (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, a Tier 3 early learning, elementary education, or special education licensure applicant who demonstrates field-specific teaching experience to complete the coursework requirements under this subdivision must demonstrate they have completed evidence-based structured literacy training according to section 120B.123, subdivision 5a, before the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board may issue an initial Tier 3 license. new text end